Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1188.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART XXXPROTECTION OF STATE-OWNED ELECTRONIC DEVICESAND NETWORKS FROM APPLICATIONSCONTROLLED BY FOREIGN ADVERSARIESChapter71. (Reserved)73. Prohibition of Unauthorized Foreign Adversary Controlled ApplicationsCHAPTER 71(Reserved)123456789101112131415161718 CHAPTER 73PROHIBITION OF UNAUTHORIZED FOREIGN ADVERSARYCONTROLLED APPLICATIONSSec.7301. Definitions.7302. Prohibition.7303. Violation.§ 7301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence" or "AI." The use of machine learning and related technologies that use data to train statistical models for the purpose of enabling computer systems to perform tasks normally associated with human intelligence or perception, such as computer vision, speech or natural language processing, translation, decision making and content generation."Artificial intelligence platform" or "AI platform." An application, an Internet website or other interface where the user accesses artificial intelligence or a program that uses artificial intelligence."Controlled by a foreign adversary." Any of the following:(1) A covered company to which at least one of the following applies:(i) A foreign person that is domiciled in, is headquartered in, has the person's principal place of business in or is organized under the laws of a foreign adversary country.(ii) An entity of which a foreign person or combination of foreign persons described under 20250HB1188PN1338 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subparagraph (i) directly or indirectly own at least 20%.(iii) A person subject to the direction or control of a foreign person or entity described under subparagraph (i) or (ii).(2) A foreign entity that:(i) is subject to an active investigation by the Federal Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States in relation to a transaction;(ii) has had a transaction blocked by the Federal Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States; or(iii) has been ordered by the Federal Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States to divest from an asset."Covered company." An entity that, directly or indirectly, including, but not limited to, through a parent company, subsidiary or affiliate, is controlled by a foreign adversary country."Foreign adversary country." A country listed under 10 U.S.C. § 4872(d)(2) (relating to acquisition of sensitive materials from non-allied foreign nations: prohibition)."Local education agency." As defined under section 220(c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."State-owned electronic device." A device with the capacity to install, maintain or update an unauthorized foreign adversary controlled application under the express control, ownership or operation of either:(1) the Commonwealth;(2) a political subdivision of the Commonwealth; or(3) a local education agency.20250HB1188PN1338 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "State-owned wireless network." A network with the capacity to install, maintain, access or update an unauthorized foreign adversary controlled application under the express control, ownership or operation of one of the following:(1) the Commonwealth;(2) a political subdivision of the Commonwealth; or(3) a local education agency."Unauthorized foreign adversary controlled artificial intelligence." Artificial intelligence technology that is operated, directly or indirectly, by a covered company or an entity owned or controlled by a covered company."Unauthorized foreign adversary controlled artificial intelligence platform." An artificial intelligence platform that is operated, directly or indirectly, by a covered company or an entity owned or controlled by a covered company.§ 7302. Prohibition.(a) On device.--A State-owned electronic device may not have an unauthorized foreign adversary controlled artificial intelligence or unauthorized foreign adversary controlled artificial intelligence platform downloaded or installed on the device.(b) On network.--An individual may not access or attempt to access an unauthorized foreign adversary controlled artificial intelligence or unauthorized foreign adversary controlled artificial intelligence platform through a State-owned wireless network.(c) Exception.--Subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to law enforcement activities, security interests, security research or risk mitigation actions.§ 7303. Violation.20250HB1188PN1338 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following shall apply to a violation of section 7302 (relating to prohibition):(1) An employee who violates section 7302 shall be referred to the State Ethics Commission for investigation under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1108 (relating to investigations by commission).(2) A violation of section 7302 may be considered acting as an agent for a private interest.(3) The State Ethics Commission shall have the authority to review, investigate and impose penalties under 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure), known as the Public Official and Employee Ethics Act, for a violation of section 7302.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1188PN1338 - 5 - 1234567891011121314